en: Filled pinsa
it: Pinsa farcita

en: Pizza sub toasts
fr: Tartines salés à cuire, Tartines style pizza

en: Frozen topped baguettes
de: Tiefgefrorene belegte Baguettes
fr: Baguettes garnies surgelées

en: Pizzas pies and quiches, Pizza pies and quiches
bg: Пица и киш
ca: Pizzes i quiches
de: Pizzas - Kuchen und Quiches
es: Pizzas - tartas y quiches
fi: pizzat ja piirakat
fr: Pizzas tartes salées et quiches
hr: Pizze pite i quichevi
it: Pizze e torte salate
nl: Pizzas - hartige taarten en quiches
pt: Pizas tortas e quiches
ru: Пицца и солёные открытые пироги
zh: 披萨、派和法式咸派

en: Mini appetizer pizzas
fr: Mini pizzas apéritives

en: Crescioni, crescione, cassoni, cassone
xx: Crescioni, crescione, cassoni, cassone

en: Pizza pockets
fr: Pizzas pocket

en: Pizzas
bg: Пица
ca: Pizzes
da: Pizza
de: Pizzen
es: Pizzas
fi: pizzat
fr: Pizzas, pizza
he: פיצות
hr: Pizze
hu: Pizzák
it: Pizze
ja: ピザ
lt: Picos
nl: Pizzas
pl: Pizza
pt: Pizzas
ru: Пицца
sv: Pizzor, Pizza
tr: Pizza
zh: 比萨

it: Calzone
fr: Calzone, Pizzas calzone
ja: カルツォーネ

en: Regina pizza, Pizza with ham and cheese and mushrooms
de: Pizza Regina
fr: Pizzas royales, Pizza royale, Pizza reine, Pizza Regina, Pizza jambon fromage champignons
hr: Regina pizza
it: Pizza Regina
lt: Picos su kumpiu ir sūriu ir grybais
nl: Ham-kaas-champignon pizza

en: Cheese and mushrooms pizza
fr: Pizza champignons fromage
hr: Pizza sa sirom i gljivama
lt: Picos su sūriu ir grybais

en: Margherita pizzas, Margherita pizza, Pizza Margherita
ar: بيتزا_مارغيريتا
bg: Пица Маргарита
da: Margherita-pizzaer
de: Pizza Margherita
es: Pizza margherita
fa: پیتزا مارگریتا
fi: margherita-pizza
fr: Pizzas margherita, pizza margherita, pizzas marguerite
hr: Pizza margherita
it: Pizza margherita
ja: マルゲリータ
ko: 마르게리타 피자
lt: Margarita picos
nl: Pizza Margherita
sv: Margherita-pizzor
zh: 瑪格麗塔披薩, 瑪格麗特披薩

en: Cheese and tomato pizzas, Cheese and tomato pizza
da: Ost- og tomatpizzaer, Pizzaer med ost og tomat
fr: Pizzas tomates fromage, Pizza au fromage et aux tomates
lt: Picos su sūriu ir pomidorų padažu
sv: Ost- och tomatpizzor

en: Vegetarian pizzas
da: Vegetariske pizzaer
fr: Pizzas végétariennes, pizza végétarienne
sv: Vegetarianska pizzor

en: Vegan pizzas, Plant-based pizzas, Vegetal pizzas
da: Veganske pizzaer
fr: Pizzas véganes, Pizzas végétales, pizzas végétaliennes, pizza végétale, pizza végétalienne, pizza végane
sv: Veganska pizzor

en: Vegan margherita pizzas, Vegan margherita pizza
da: Veganske margherita-pizzaer
fr: Pizzas margherita véganes
sv: Veganska margherita-pizzor

en: Pizza with ham and cheese, Ham and cheese pizza
de: Pizza mit Schinken und Käse
es: Pizza con jamón y queso, Pizza jamón y queso
fi: Kinkku-juusto pizza
fr: Pizza jambon fromage, Pizzas jambon-fromage
hr: Pizza sa šunkom i sirom
it: Pizza prosciutto e formaggio
lt: Picos su kumpiu ir sūriu
nl: Ham-kaas pizzas
pl: Pizza z serem i szynką

en: Chicken pizza
es: Pizza de pollo
fr: Pizza au poulet
hr: Pizza s piletinom
lt: Picos su vištiena

en: Chorizo pizzas, Chorizo pizza, Salami pizza
de: Chorizo Pizzas
es: Pizzas de chorizo
fr: Pizzas au chorizo, Pizzas chorizo, Pizza au chorizo, Pizza au salami
hr: Chorizo ​​pizze
lt: Picos su saliamiu, Čhorizo picos
nl: Chorizopizzas

en: Pepperoni pizzas
de: Salami Pizzas
es: Pizzas de pepperoni
fi: Pepperonipizzat
fr: Pizzas au pepperoni, Pizzas avec pepperoni, Pizzas pepperoni
hr: Feferoni pizze
it: Pizze ai peperoni
ja: ペパロニピザ
lt: Pepperoni picos, Picos su pepperoni
nl: Pepperonipizzas